Missouri, session 2026, HB2561.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 92.130, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 92.130, to read as follows:
92.130. 1. The income received by any of the following shall not be taxable under
any tax ordinance enacted under the provisions of sections 92.110 to 92.200:
(1) Labor, agricultural or horticultural organizations;
(2) Mutual savings bank not having a capital stock represented by shares;
(3) Fraternal-beneficiary society, order or association, operating under the lodge
system or for the exclusive benefit of the members of a fraternity itself operating under the
lodge system, and providing for the payment of life, sick, accident or other benefits to the
members of such society, order, or association or their dependents;
(4) Domestic building and loan associations and credit unions without capital stock
organized and operated for mutual purposes and without profit;
(5) Cemetery company owned and operated exclusively for the benefit of its
members, unless said cemetery is operated for profit;
(6) Corporation or association organized and operated exclusively for religious,
charitable, scientific or educational purposes, no part of the net income of which inures to the
benefit of any private stockholder or individual;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2561 2
(7) Business league, chamber of commerce or board of trade not organized for profit
and no part of the net income of which inures to the benefit of any private stockholder or
individual;
(8) Civic league or organization not organized for profit but operated exclusively for
the promotion of social welfare;
(9) Club organized and operated exclusively for pleasure, recreation and other
nonprofitable purposes, no part of the net income of which inures to the benefit of any private
stockholder or member;
(10) Farmers or other mutual hail, cyclone or fire insurance company, mutual ditch or
irrigation company, mutual or cooperative telephone company, or like organization, the
income of which consists solely of assessments, dues and fees collected from members for the
sole purpose of meeting its expenses;
(11) Farmers, fruit growers or like association, organized and operated as a sales
agent for the purpose of marketing the products of its members and turning back to them the
proceeds of sales, less the necessary selling expenses, on the basis of the quantity of produce
furnished by them;
(12) Corporation or association organized for the exclusive purpose of holding title to
property, collecting income therefrom, and turning over the entire amount thereof, less
expenses, to an organization which itself is exempt from the tax imposed by chapter 143;
(13) Federal land banks and national farm loan associations, as provided in section 26
of an act of Congress approved July 17, 1916, entitled "An act to provide capital for
agricultural development, to create standard forms of investment based upon farm mortgage,
to equalize rates of interest upon farm loans, to furnish a market for United States bonds, to
create government depositaries and financial agents for the United States, and for other
purposes";
(14) Joint stock land banks as to income derived from bonds or debentures or other
joint stock land banks or any federal land bank belonging to such joint stock land bank;
(15) Express companies which now pay an annual tax on their gross receipts in this
state and insurance companies which pay an annual tax on their gross premium receipts in this
state;
(16) Trusts created by an employer and employees as part of a stock bonus, pension
or profit-sharing plan, for the exclusive benefit of employees, to which contributions are
made by such employer or employees, or both, for the purpose of distributing to such
employees the earnings and principal of the fund accumulated by the trust in accordance with
such plan, or a trust consisting solely of one or more restricted retirement funds created for
one or more self-employed persons as part of a retirement plan for the exclusive benefit of
such self-employed person or persons, to which contributions are made by such self-

HB 2561 3
employed person or persons, for the purpose of distributing to such self-employed person or
persons the earnings and principal of the fund accumulated by the trust in accordance with
such plan and the amount actually distributed, or made available to any distributee; [shall not
be taxable under any tax ordinance enacted pursuant to the provisions of sections 92.110 to
92.200] or
(17) Income received as salaries, wages, commissions, and other compensation
earned by an individual for work done or services performed or rendered in the
performance of the individual's official duties in the city if such individual:
(a) Is employed by this state; or
(b) Meets the definition of public safety personnel, as defined in section
173.2655.
2. The following income shall be exempt, regardless of who receives it, from such
tax:
(1) The proceeds of life insurance policies paid to the individual beneficiaries upon
the death of the insured;
(2) The amount received by the insured as a return of premium or premiums paid by
him under life insurance or endowment contracts, either during the term or at the maturity of
the term mentioned in the contract or upon the surrender of the contract;
(3) Any amount received under workers' compensation acts, as compensation for
personal injuries or sickness, plus the amount of any damages received whether by suit or
agreement on account of such injuries or sickness, or through the war risk insurance act or
any law for the benefit or relief of injured or disabled members of the military or naval forces
of the United States;
(4) The value of property acquired by gift, bequest, devise or descent, but the income
from such property shall be included as income;
(5) Interest upon the obligations of this state or of any political subdivision thereof, or
upon the obligations of the United States or its possessions;
(6) Any income derived from any public utility performing functions of national
government or those incident to the state or any political subdivision thereof, or from the
exercise of any essential government function accruing to any state, territory or the District of
Columbia; provided, that whenever any state, territory or the District of Columbia, or any
political subdivision of a state or territory has, prior to the passage of chapter 143, entered in
good faith into a contract with any person or corporation the object and purpose of which is to
acquire, construct, operate or maintain a public utility, no tax shall be levied under the
provisions of chapter 143 upon the income derived from the operation of such public utility,
so far as the payment thereof will impose a loss or burden upon such state, territory or the
District of Columbia, or a political subdivision of this state; but this provision is not intended

HB 2561 4
to confer upon such person or corporation any financial gain or exemption or to relieve such
person or corporation from the payment of a tax as provided for in chapter 143 upon the part
or portion of said income to which such person or corporation shall be entitled under such
contract.
✔